Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act
14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-233.
Qualifications for directors.

All directors must be individuals. The articles or bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 67, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Qualifications of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-8.02.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-235.
Number of directors.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the number of directors shall be specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles or bylaws.

If the corporation: (i) is a charitable organization as defined in Section 79-11-501; (ii) which solicits contributions or intends to solicit contributions in the state by any means whatsoever; and (iii) is incorporated on or after January 1, 2012, the board must consist of not less than three (3) directors, with the number of directors specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles or bylaws.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased in conformance with law from time to time by amendment to or in the manner prescribed in the articles or bylaws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 68; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added “Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection” at the beginning of (1)(a); added (1)(b); inserted “in conformance with law” following “The number of directors may be increased or decreased” in (2).

Number and election of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.03, 79-4-8.04.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-237.
Election, appointment or designation of directors.

If the corporation has members, all the directors (except the initial directors) shall be elected at the first annual meeting of members, and at each annual meeting thereafter, unless the articles or bylaws provide some other time or method of election or provide that some of the directors are appointed by some other person or designated.

If the corporation does not have members, all the directors (except the initial directors) shall be elected, appointed or designated as provided in the articles or bylaws. If no method of designation or appointment is set forth in the articles or bylaws, the directors (other than the initial directors) shall be elected by the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 69, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Number and election of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.03, 79-4-8.04.

Substantial evidence supported chancellor’s ruling that the best evidence was the corporate minutes and that there was no evidence in the minutes to support appellants’ claim that they had been elected as members of corporation and had authority to replace the board of directors because corporate records constitute best evidence of corporate acts. Because there was no evidence that there were any members of the corporation, the corporation’s board of directors had the authority to elect the directors and the board became self-perpetuating under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-11-237(2). His Way, Inc. v. McMillin, 909 So. 2d 738, 2005 Miss. App. LEXIS 529 (Miss. Ct. App. 2005).

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1189, 1216.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 293, 294.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-239.
Term of office of directors.

The articles or bylaws must specify the terms of directors. Except for designated or appointed directors, the terms of directors may not exceed five (5) years. In the absence of any term specified in the articles or bylaws, the term of each director shall be one (1) year. Directors may be elected for successive terms.

A decrease in the number of directors or term of office does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws:

The term of a director filling a vacancy in the office of a director elected by members expires at the next election of directors by members; and

The term of a director filling any other vacancy expires at the end of the unexpired term which such director is filling.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, the director continues to serve until the director’s successor is elected, designated or appointed and qualifies, or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 70, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Terms of office of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.05, 79-4-8.06.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-241.
Staggering terms of directors.

The articles or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups. The terms of office of the several groups need not be uniform.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 71, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Terms of office of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.05, 79-4-8.06.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1216.

§79-11-243.
Resignation of director.

A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the board of directors, its presiding officer or to the president or secretary.

A resignation is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 72, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Resignation of director under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-8.07.

Filling of vacancy in board of directors caused by resignation of director effective at later date under this section, see § 79-11-251.

§79-11-245.
Removal of directors.

The members may remove one or more directors elected by them without cause.

If a director is elected by a class, chapter or other organization unit or by region or other geographic grouping, the director may be removed only by the members of that class, chapter, unit or grouping.

Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, a director may be removed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section only if the number of votes cast to remove the director would be sufficient to elect the director at a meeting to elect directors.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director may not be removed if the number of votes, or if the director was elected by a class, chapter, unit or grouping of members, the number of votes of that class, chapter, unit or grouping, sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against the director’s removal.

A director elected by members may be removed by the members only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

In computing whether a director is protected from removal under subsections (2) through (4) of this section, it should be assumed that the votes against removal are cast in an election for the number of directors of the class to which the director to be removed belonged on the date of that director’s election.

An entire board of directors may be removed under subsections (1) through (5) of this section.

The board of directors of a corporation may remove a director without cause who has been elected by the board by the vote of a two-thirds (2/3) of the directors then in office or such greater number as is set forth in the articles or bylaws.

If at the beginning of a director’s term on the board, the articles or bylaws provide that the director may be removed for missing a specified number of board meetings, the board may remove the director for failing to attend the specified number of meetings. The director may be removed only if a majority of the directors then in office vote for the removal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 73, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Removal of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.08, 79-4-8.09.

Applicability of this section to removal of director elected by cumulative voting, see § 79-11-223.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-247.
Removal of designated director or appointed director.

A designated director may be removed by an amendment to the article or bylaws deleting or changing the designation.

Appointed directors:

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, an appointed director may be removed without cause by the person appointing the director;

The person removing the director shall do so by giving written notice of the removal to the director and either the presiding officer of the board or the corporation’s president or secretary;

A removal is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a future effective date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 74, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Removal of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.08, 79-4-8.09.

§79-11-249.
Removal of director by court proceeding.

The chancery court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located may remove any director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or its members holding at least ten percent (10%) of the voting power of any class if the court finds that:

the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation, or a final judgment has been entered finding that the director has violated a duty set forth in Sections 79-11-267 and 79-11-269, and

removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from serving on the board for a period prescribed by the court.

If members commence a proceeding under subsection (1) of this section, the corporation shall be made a party defendant.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 75, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Removal of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.08, 79-4-8.09.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 291, 300, 301.

§79-11-251.
Filling of vacancy in board of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, and except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The members, if any, may fill the vacancy; provided that if the vacant office was held by a director elected by a class, chapter or other organizational unit or by region or other geographic grouping, only members of the class, chapter, unit or grouping are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the members;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, if a vacant office was held by an appointed director, only the person who appointed the director may fill the vacancy.

If a vacant office was held by a designated director, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in the articles or bylaws. In the absence of an applicable article or bylaw provision, the vacancy may not be filled by the board.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date (by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under Section 79-11-243(2) or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 76, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Filling vacancy on board under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-8.10.

§79-11-253.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 77, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Compensation of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-8.11.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-255.
Meetings of board of directors.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 78, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.20 through 79-4-8.25.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to committees of the board and their members, see § 79-11-265.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1257.

§79-11-257.
Action taken by board of directors without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by Section 79-11-101 et seq. to be taken at a board of directors’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. The action must be evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director, and included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section is effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 79, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (1) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.20 through 79-4-8.25.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to committees of the board and their members, see § 79-11-265.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1257.

§79-11-259.
Notice of regular and special meetings of board of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors must be preceded by at least two (2) days’ notice of the date, time and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 80, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.20 through 79-4-8.25.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to committees of the board and their members, see § 79-11-265.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for meeting of directors to amend bylaws of corporation with no members, see § 79-11-313.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for meeting of board of directors to approve plan of merger, see § 79-11-321.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for meeting of board of directors to approve the sale or other disposition of a corporation’s property not in the usual course of business, see § 79-11-331.

Notice requirements for meeting of board of directors or incorporators of corporation without members to dissolve the corporation, see § 79-11-333 and § 79-11-335.

§79-11-261.
Waiver of notice of meeting of board of directors.

A director may waive any notice required by Section 79-11-101 et seq., the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to him of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 81, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (1) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.20 through 79-4-8.25.

Applicability of this section to committees of the board and their members, see § 79-11-265.

§79-11-263.
Quorum of board of directors; director present at meeting deemed to have assented to action taken; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 79-11-101 et seq., the articles or bylaws, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the directors in office immediately before a meeting begins.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board unless Section 79-11-101 et seq., the articles or bylaws, require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless: (a) he objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon his arrival, to holding it or transacting business at the meeting; (b) his dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or (c) he delivers written notice of his dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 82; Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (1) and (2) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.20 through 79-4-8.25.

Applicability of this section to committees of the board and their members, see § 79-11-265.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1257.

§79-11-265.
Committees of board of directors.

Unless prohibited or limited by the articles or bylaws, a board of directors may create one or more committees of the board and appoint members of the board to serve on them. Each committee shall have two (2) or more directors who serve at the pleasure of the board.

The creation of a committee and appointment of directors to it must be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the articles or bylaws to take action under Section 79-11-263.

Sections 79-11-255 through 79-11-263, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board, apply to committees of the board and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles or bylaws, each committee of the board may exercise the board’s authority under Section 79-11-231.

A committee of the board may not, however:

Authorize distributions;

Approve or recommend to members dissolution, merger or the sale, pledge or transfer of all or substantially all of the corporation’s assets;

Elect, appoint or remove directors or fill vacancies on the board or on any of its committees; or

Adopt, amend or repeal the articles or bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in Section 79-11-267.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 83, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Meetings and actions of the board under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.20 through 79-4-8.25.

Requirement that corporation keep permanent record of all actions taken by committees of board of directors as authorized by this section, see § 79-11-283.

§79-11-267.
Director to act in best interests of corporation; director’s reliance upon others for information; liability of directors.

A director shall discharge his duties as a director, including his duties as a member of a committee, in accordance with his good faith belief that he is acting in the best interests of the corporation.

Unless he has knowledge or information concerning the matter in question that makes reliance unwarranted, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director believes, in good faith, to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the director believes, in good faith, are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which he is not a member if the director believes, in good faith, that the committee merits confidence.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action, if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this section.

A person alleging a violation of this section has the burden of proving the violation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a director of a corporation that is a charitable organization as defined in Section 79-11-501 shall not be liable to the corporation or its members for money damages for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

The amount of a financial benefit received by the director to which the director is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm;

A violation of Section 79-11-270; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 84; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 12, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added (5).

General standards for directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.30 through 79-4-8.33.

Violation of duty set forth in this section as ground for removal of director, see § 79-11-249.

Provision that creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by committee does not alone constitute compliance by director with standards of conduct described in this section, see § 79-11-265.

Liability of director for unlawful distribution, see § 79-11-270.

Inability of corporation to indemnify director against his or her failure to act in accordance with standard of conduct provided in this section, see § 79-11-281.

Applicability of this section to conduct of directors after dissolution of corporation, see § 79-11-341.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1314, 1460, 1480, 1540.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 311-336.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-269.
Conflict of interest transaction.

A conflict of interest transaction is a transaction with the corporation in which a director of the corporation has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict of interest transaction is not voidable by the corporation solely because of the director’s interest in the transaction if any one (1) of the following is true:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors and the board of directors or committee authorized, approved or ratified the transaction;

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the members entitled to vote and they authorized, approved or ratified the transaction; or

The transaction was fair to the corporation.

For purposes of this section, a director of the corporation has an indirect interest in a transaction if (a) another entity in which he has a material financial interest or in which he is a general partner is a party to the transaction, or (b) another entity of which he is a director, officer or trustee is a party to the transaction and the transaction is or should be considered by the board of directors of the corporation.

For purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved or ratified if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors on the board of directors (or on the committee) who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction, but a transaction may not be authorized, approved or ratified under this section by a single director. If a majority of the directors who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction vote to authorize, approve or ratify the transaction, a quorum is present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director with a direct or indirect interest in the transaction does not affect the validity of any action taken under subsection (1)(a) of this section if the transaction is otherwise authorized, approved or ratified as provided in that subsection.

For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved or ratified if it receives the vote of a majority of the members whose votes are entitled to be counted under this subsection. The vote of a member who is a director who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and the vote of a member who is under the control of an entity described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, may not be counted in a vote of members to determine whether to authorize, approve or ratify a conflict of interest transaction under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The vote of those members, however, shall be counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of Section 79-11-101 et seq. A majority of the members, whether or not present, whose votes are entitled to be counted in a vote on the transaction under this subsection constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 85, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (4) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

General standards for directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.30 through 79-4-8.33.

Director’s conflict of interest under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.60 through 79-4-8.70.

Requirement that notice of meetings of members include a description of any matters which must be approved by the members under this section, see § 79-11-205.

Violation of duty set forth in this section as ground for removal of director, see § 79-11-249.

§79-11-270.
Liability of director for unlawful distribution.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of Section 79-11-101 et seq. is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating Section 79-11-101 et seq., if it is established that he did not perform his duties in compliance with Section 79-11-267. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available to a director.

A director held liable under subsection (1) for an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution:

From every other director who could be held liable under subsection (1) for the unlawful distribution; and

From each person who received an unlawful distribution for the amount of the distribution whether or not the person receiving the distribution knew it was made in violation of Section 79-11-101 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (1) and (2)(b) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

General standards for directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.30 through 79-4-8.33.

§79-11-271.
Officers of corporation.

A corporation has the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

A duly appointed officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors’ and members’ meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 86, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.40 through 79-4-8.44.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1534 et seq.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-273.
Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 87, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.40 through 79-4-8.44.

Applicability of this section to definition of “secretary” for purposes of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-127.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1328 et seq.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-275.
Officers to act in best interests of corporation; reliance upon others for information; liability of officers.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority, in accordance with his good faith belief that he is acting in the best interests of the corporation.

Unless he has knowledge or information concerning the matter in question that makes reliance unwarranted, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer believes, in good faith, to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the officer believes, in good faith, are within the person’s professional or expert competence.

An officer is not liable for any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action, if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this section.

A person alleging a violation of this section has the burden of proving the violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 88, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.40 through 79-4-8.44.

Inability of corporation to indemnify officer against his or her failure to act in accordance with standard of conduct provided in this section, see § 79-11-281.

Applicability of this section to conduct of officers after dissolution of corporation, see § 79-11-341.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1314, 1333, 1460, 1480, 1540.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 311-336.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-277.
Resignation or removal of officer.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date and the corporation accepts the future effective date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board of directors provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

A board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 89, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.40 through 79-4-8.44.

14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-279.
Contract rights between officer and corporation.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights between the officer and the corporation.

An officer’s removal does not affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 90, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.40 through 79-4-8.44.